Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,240
Act; how construed; liability.

The Conveyance Safety Act shall not be construed to relieve or lessen the responsibility or liability of any person owning, operating, controlling, maintaining, erecting, constructing, installing, altering, testing, or repairing any conveyance covered by the act for damages to person or property caused by any defect therein. By administering the Conveyance Safety Act, the state and its officers and employees assume no liability for accidents involving a conveyance.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 31;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2531;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 76.